Idaho statutes. Title 28 COMMERCIAL TRANSACTIONS
Part 1
Insurance in General

§ 28-44-101. Short title. — This chapter shall be known and may be cited as Idaho Credit Code

Insurance in Regulated Consumer Credit Transactions.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-44-101, as added by 1983, ch. 119, § 3, p. 264.

§ 28-44-102. Scope — Relation to credit insurance act — Applicability to parties.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, this chapter applies to insurance provided or to be provided in relation to a regulated consumer credit transaction, as defined in section 28-41-301, Idaho Code.

The provision on cancellation by a creditor, section 28-44-304, Idaho Code, applies to loans the primary purpose of which is the financing of insurance. No other provision of this chapter applies to insurance so financed.

This chapter supplements and does not repeal the credit insurance act, chapter 23, title 41, Idaho Code. The provisions of this act concerning administrative controls, liabilities, and penalties do not apply to persons acting as insurers, as defined by title 41, Idaho Code, or rules prescribed by the director of the department of insurance.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-44-102, as added by 1983, ch. 119, § 3, p. 264; am. 2013, ch. 54, § 11, p. 108.

§ 28-44-103. Credit insurance — Credit Insurance Act — Defined.

In this act, “credit insurance” means insurance, other than insurance on property, by which the satisfaction of debt in whole or in part is a benefit provided, but does not include:

Insurance provided in relation to a credit transaction in which a payment is scheduled more than fifteen (15) years after the extension of credit;

Insurance issued as an isolated transaction on the part of the insurer not related to an agreement or plan for insuring debtors of the creditor; or

Insurance indemnifying the creditor against loss due to the debtor’s default.

“Credit Insurance Act” means chapter 23, title 41, Idaho Code.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-44-103, as added by 1983, ch. 119, § 3, p. 264.

§ 28-44-104. Creditor’s provision of and charge for insurance — Excess amount of charge.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter and subject to the provision on maximum [finance] charges, section 28-42-201, Idaho Code, a creditor may agree to provide insurance, and may contract for and receive a charge for insurance separate from and in addition to other charges. A creditor need not make a separate charge for insurance provided or required by him. This act does not authorize the issuance of any insurance prohibited under any statute, or rule thereunder, governing the business of insurance.

The excess amount of a charge for insurance provided for in agreements in violation of this chapter is an excess charge for the purposes of the provisions of the chapter on remedies and penalties, chapter 45, title 28, Idaho Code, and of the provisions of the chapter on administration, chapter 46, title 28, Idaho Code, as to civil actions by the administrator, section 28-46-113, Idaho Code.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-44-104, as added by 1983, ch. 119, § 3, p. 264.

§ 28-44-105. Conditions applying to insurance to be provided by creditor.

If a creditor agrees with a debtor to provide insurance:

The insurance shall be evidenced by an individual policy, certificate of insurance, application or notice of proposed insurance, disclosed to debtor pursuant to the provisions of section 41-2308, Idaho Code; or

The creditor shall promptly notify the debtor of any failure or delay in providing the insurance.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-44-105, as added by 1983, ch. 119, § 3, p. 264.

§ 28-44-106. Unconscionability.

In applying the provisions of this act on unconscionability, sections 28-45-106 and 28-46-111, Idaho Code, to a separate charge for insurance, consideration shall be given, among other factors, to:

Potential benefits to the debtor including the satisfaction of his obligations;

The creditor’s need for the protection provided by the insurance; and

The relation between the amount and terms of credit granted and the insurance benefits provided.

If credit insurance otherwise complies with this chapter and other applicable law, neither the amount nor the term of the insurance nor the amount of a charge therefor is in itself unconscionable.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-44-106, as added by 1983, ch. 119, § 3, p. 264.

§ 28-44-107. Maximum charge by creditor for insurance.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, if a creditor contracts for or receives a separate charge for insurance, the amount charged to the debtor for the insurance may not exceed the premium to be charged by the insurer, as computed at the time the charge to the debtor is determined, conforming to any rate filings required by law and made by the insurer with the director of the department of insurance.

A creditor who provides credit insurance in relation to open-end credit, as defined in section 28-41-301, Idaho Code, may calculate the charge to the debtor in each billing cycle by applying the current premium rate to:

The average daily unpaid balance of the debt in the cycle;

The unpaid balance of the debt or a median amount within a specified range of unpaid balances of debt on approximately the same day of the cycle. The day of the cycle need not be the day used in calculating the finance charge, section 28-42-201, Idaho Code, but the specified range shall be the range used for that purpose; or

The unpaid balances of principal calculated according to the actuarial method.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-44-107, as added by 1983, ch. 119, § 3, p. 264; am. 2013, ch. 54, § 12, p. 108; am. 2014, ch. 97, § 11, p. 265.

§ 28-44-108. Refund or credit required — Amount.

Upon prepayment in full of a regulated consumer credit sale or regulated consumer loan by the proceeds of credit insurance, the debtor or his estate is entitled to a refund of any portion of a separate charge for insurance which by reason of prepayment is retained by the creditor or returned to him by the insurer, unless the charge was computed from time to time on the basis of the balances of the debtor’s account.

This chapter does not require a creditor to grant a refund or credit to the debtor if all refunds and credits due to the debtor under this chapter amount to less than five dollars ($5.00), and except as provided in subsection (1) of this section, does not require the creditor to account to the debtor for any portion of a separate charge for insurance because:

The insurance is terminated by performance of the insurer’s obligation;

The creditor pays or accounts for premiums to the insurer in amounts and at times determined by the agreement between them; or

The creditor receives directly or indirectly under any policy of insurance a gain or advantage not prohibited by law, or regulations prescribed by the director of the department of insurance.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the creditor shall promptly make or cause to be made an appropriate refund or credit to the debtor with respect to any separate charge made to him for insurance if:

The insurance is not provided or is provided for a shorter term than that for which the charge to the debtor for insurance was computed; or

The insurance terminates prior to the end of the term for which it was written because of prepayment in full or otherwise.

A refund or credit required by subsection (3) of this section is appropriate as to amount if it is computed according to a method prescribed or approved by the director of the department of insurance or a formula filed by the insurer with the director of the department of insurance at least thirty (30) days before the debtor’s right to a refund or credit becomes determinable, unless the method or formula is employed after the director of the department of insurance notifies the insurer that he disapproves it.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-44-108, as added by 1983, ch. 119, § 3, p. 264; am. 1993, ch. 42, § 1, p. 114.

§ 28-44-109. Existing insurance — Choice of insurer.

If a creditor requires insurance, upon notice to the creditor, the debtor, as provided in section 41-2313, Idaho Code, shall have the option of providing the required insurance through an existing policy of insurance owned or controlled by the debtor, or through a policy to be obtained and paid for by the debtor, but the creditor may for reasonable cause, as defined in section 41-1312, Idaho Code, decline the insurance provided by the debtor.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-44-109, as added by 1983, ch. 119, § 3, p. 264.

§ 28-44-110. Charge for insurance in connection with a deferral, refinancing, or consolidation — Duplicate charges.

A creditor may not contract for or receive a separate charge for insurance in connection with a deferral, section 28-42-302, Idaho Code, a refinancing, section 28-42-303, Idaho Code, or a consolidation, section 28-42-304, Idaho Code, unless:

The debtor agrees at or before the time of the deferral, refinancing, or consolidation that the charge may be made;

The debtor is or is to be provided with insurance for an amount or a term, or insurance of a kind, in addition to that to which he would have been entitled had there been no deferral, refinancing, or consolidation;

The debtor receives a refund or credit on account of any unexpired term of existing insurance in the amount that would be required if the insurance were terminated, section 28-44-108, Idaho Code; and

The charge does not exceed the amount permitted by this chapter, section 28-44-107, Idaho Code.

A creditor may not contract for or receive a separate charge for insurance which duplicates insurance with respect to which the creditor has previously contracted for or received a separate charge.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-44-110, as added by 1983, ch. 119, § 3, p. 264.

§ 28-44-111. Cooperation between departments.

The director of the department of finance and the director of the department of insurance are authorized and directed to consult and assist one another in maintaining compliance with this chapter. They may jointly pursue investigations, prosecute suits, and take other official action, as may seem to them appropriate, if either of them is otherwise empowered to take the action. If the director [of the department of finance] is informed of a violation or suspected violation by an insurer of this chapter, or of the insurance laws, rules, and regulations of this state, he shall advise the director of the department of insurance of the circumstances.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-44-111, as added by 1983, ch. 119, § 3, p. 264.